Montana, session 2025, SB473.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Prohibiting weather modification BY GEOENGINEERING. (1) THE
LEGISLATURE FINDS THAT GEOENGINEERING POSES RISKS TO THE ENVIRONMENT AND PUBLIC HEALTH DUE TO ITS
EXPERIMENTAL NATURE AND POTENTIAL FOR UNINTENDED CONSEQUENCES.
(2) Except as FOR WEATHER MODIFICATION BY CLOUD SEEDING AS prescribed in 85-3-101 through 85-
3- 424 TITLE 85, CHAPTER 3, a person may not intentionally inject, release, or disperse chemicals, chemical
compounds, substances, or apparatuses within the borders of Montana expressly for: GEOENGINEERING.
(a) engaging in weather modification and control;
(b) affecting temperature; or
(c) affecting the intensity of the sunlight.
(2)(3) As used in this section:
(a) "chemical compounds" means any combination of any number of chemicals;
(b) "chemicals" means industrial substances, whether simple, compound, or obtained through the
process of the science and art of chemistry, whether of organic or inorganic origin; and
(c) "weather modification and control" means changing or controlling or attempting to change or
control, by artificial methods, the natural development of atmospheric cloud forms or precipitation forms that
occur in the troposphere.
(A) "CLOUD SEEDING" MEANS A PROVEN METHOD OF INCREASING PRECIPITATION WITHIN EXISTING CLOUD
SYSTEMS TO SUPPORT WATER RESOURCE MANAGEMENT EFFORTS, INCLUDING FOR AGRICULTURE AND SNOW MAKING.
(B) "GEOENGINEERING" MEANS LARGE-SCALE, INTENTIONAL INTERVENTIONS IN THE EARTH'S CLIMATE
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 473

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0473.2
SYSTEM DESIGNED TO COUNTERACT OR MITIGATE GLOBAL CLIMATE CHANGE, INCLUDING STRATOSPHERIC AEROSOL
INJECTION, SOLAR RADIATION MANAGEMENT, AND MARINE CLOUD BRIGHTENING, THAT INVOLVE ALTERING ATMOSPHERIC,
OCEANIC, OR TERRESTRIAL SYSTEMS ON A PLANETARY SCALE WITH POTENTIALLY UNPREDICTABLE AND WIDESPREAD
ENVIRONMENTAL CONSEQUENCES.
(C) "MARINE CLOUD BRIGHTENING" MEANS SPRAYING SEA SALT PARTICLES INTO MARINE CLOUDS TO
INCREASE REFLECTIVITY AND REDUCE THE SOLAR RADIATION ABSORBED BY THE EARTH.
(D) "SOLAR RADIATION MANAGEMENT" MEANS MANAGING SOLAR RADIATION REACHING THE EARTH'S
SURFACE THROUGH STRATOSPHERIC AEROSOL INJECTION, SPACE-BASED REFLECTORS, OR CLOUD ALBEDO
ENHANCEMENT.
(E) "STRATOSPHERIC AEROSOL INJECTION" MEANS INJECTING REFLECTIVE PARTICLES INTO THE
STRATOSPHERE TO REFLECT SUNLIGHT AND REDUCE GLOBAL TEMPERATURES.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 75, chapter 2, and the provisions of Title 75, chapter 2, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. [THIS ACT] IS EFFECTIVE ON PASSAGE AND APPROVAL.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 473